testing/myv-tests-adj.yaml
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашосонсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашосонсетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашосонсетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашосонсетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашосонсетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашосонсетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашосонсетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашосонсетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашосонсетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашосонсетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашосонсетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашосонсетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашосонсетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашосонсетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашосонсетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашосонсетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашосонсетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: ашосонсетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: ашосонсетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: ашосонсетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: ашосонсетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: ашосонсетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: ашосонсетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: ашосонсетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: ашосонсетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашостонседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашостонседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашостонсекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашостонсекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашостонсесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашостонсесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашостонсенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашостонсенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашостонсентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашостонсентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашостонседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашостонседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашостонсесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашостонсесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашостонсестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашостонсестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашостонсеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашостонсеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашостонсевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашостонсевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашостонсешканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашостонсешканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашостонсексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашостонсексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашостонсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашостонсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашостонсетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашостонсетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашостонсетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашостонсетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашостонсетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашостонсетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашостонсетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашостонсетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашостонсетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашостонсетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашостонсетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашостонсетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашостонсетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашостонсетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашостонсетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашостонсетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: ашостонсетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: ашостонсетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: ашостонсетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: ашостонсетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: ашостонсетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: ашостонсетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: ашостонсетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: ашостонсетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашованкседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашованкседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашованксекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашованксекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашованксесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашованксесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашованксенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашованксенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашованксентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашованксентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашованкседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашованкседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашованксесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашованксесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашованксестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашованксестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашованксеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашованксеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашованксевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашованксевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашованксешканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашованксешканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашованксексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашованксексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашованксетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашованксетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашованксетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашованксетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашованксетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: ашованксетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашованксетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: ашованксетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашованксетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: ашованксетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашованксетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: ашованксетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашованксетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: ашованксетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашованксетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашованксетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашованксетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: ашованксетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: ашованксетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: ашованксетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: ашованксетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: ашованксетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: ашованксетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: ашованксетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: ашованксетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: ашованксетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашотседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: ашотседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашотсекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: ашотсекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашотсесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: ашотсесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашотсенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: ашотсенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашотсентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: ашотсентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашотседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: ашотседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашотсесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: ашотсесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашотсестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: ашотсестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашотсеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: ашотсеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашотсевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: ашотсевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашотсевтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: ашотсевтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашотсексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: ашотсексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашотсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: ашотсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: ашотсетнень
